Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 5 Programs and Protection for Children and Youth

Cross references.

Juvenile justice system, T. 15, C. 11.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1986, p. 1204), the General Assembly urged certain public organizations and state agencies to develop programs for the education and training of social services and criminal justice professionals in the areas of child abuse, sexual abuse, and sexual exploitation.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Bright from the Start, Georgia Department of Early Care and Learning, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Title 591.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).

For case comment, “Taylor v. Ledbetter: Vindicating the Constitutional Rights of Foster Children to Adequate Care and Protection,” see 22 Ga. L. Rev. 1187 (1988).